Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 4
TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO AUTHORIZED
COOPERATIVES FROM DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING

6-18-401. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part repealed, p. 1011, § 23, effective August 4.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1994, and this part 4 was not amended prior to its repeal in 2004. For the text of this part 4 prior to 2004, consult the 2003 Colorado Revised Statutes.